Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,126
Lane direction control signals; signs.

When lane direction control signals are placed over the individual lanes of a street or highway, vehicular traffic may travel in any lane over which a specified or appropriate green indication is shown but shall not enter or travel in any lane over which a specified or appropriate red indication is shown. When such signals are in use, signs adequate to advise motorists of the meaning of such signals shall be erected.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-617;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 222.